Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2447.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 20, chapter 4, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-841.14, to read: START_STATUTE20-841.14. Certified registered nurse anesthetist; reimbursement rate A. A hospital service corporation or medical service corporation that issues, amends or renews a subscription contract on or after the effective date of this section may not impose a reimbursement rate for a certified registered nurse anesthetist who is authorized to perform services pursuant to section 32-1634.04 that differs from the reimbursement rate for a physician who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17. B. This section does not prevent a hospital service corporation or medical service corporation from establishing variable reimbursement rates that are based on quality or performance-based measures. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 20, chapter 4, article 9, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-1057.21, to read: START_STATUTE20-1057.21. Certified registered nurse anesthetist; reimbursement rate A. A health care services organization that issues, amends or renews an evidence of coverage on or after the effective date of this section may not impose a reimbursement rate for a certified registered nurse anesthetist who is authorized to perform services pursuant to section 32-1634.04 that differs from the reimbursement rate for a physician who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17. B. This section does not prevent a health care services organization from establishing variable reimbursement rates that are based on quality or performance-based measures. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 20, chapter 6, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-1376.11, to read: START_STATUTE20-1376.11. Certified registered nurse anesthetist; reimbursement rate A. A disability insurer that issues, amends or renews a policy on or after the effective date of this section may not impose a reimbursement rate for a certified registered nurse anesthetist who is authorized to perform services pursuant to section 32-1634.04 that differs from the reimbursement rate for a physician who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17. B. This section does not prevent a disability insurer from establishing variable reimbursement rates that are based on quality or performance-based measures. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Title 20, chapter 6, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-1406.11, to read: START_STATUTE20-1406.11. Certified registered nurse anesthetist; reimbursement rate A. A group or blanket disability insurer that issues, amends or renews a policy on or after the effective date of this section may not impose a reimbursement rate for a certified registered nurse anesthetist who is authorized to perform services pursuant to section 32-1634.04 that differs from the reimbursement rate for a physician who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17. B. This section does not prevent a group or blanket disability insurer from establishing variable reimbursement rates that are based on quality or performance-based measures. END_STATUTE